Massachusetts, session 194th, H3115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause twenty-second of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph
and inserting in the place thereof the following paragraph:-
(a) Soldiers and sailors who, as a result of disabilities contracted while in the line of duty,
have a disability rating of ten per cent or more as determined by the Veterans Administration or
by any branch of the armed forces. After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this
clause, veterans who according to the records of the Veterans Administration by reason of such
service in the armed forces of the United States have suffered in the line of duty permanent
disability will not be required in any subsequent year to reapply or present further evidence of
the existence of the facts in the city or town in which the exemption has been allowed. Further
evidence of the existence of the facts will be required in subsequent years for veterans whose
disabilities the Veterans Administration has not deemed permanent; provided, however, that the
assessors may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the
of 2

soldier or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was
first granted.
SECTION 2. Clause twenty-second E of Section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in the place thereof the
following paragraph:-
“After the assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, veterans who
according to the records of the Veterans Administration by reason of such service in the armed
forces of the United States have suffered in the line of duty permanent disability will not be
required in any subsequent year to reapply or present further evidence of the existence of the
facts in the city or town in which the exemption has been allowed; provided, however, that the
assessors may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the
soldier or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was
first granted. Further evidence of the existence of the facts will be required in subsequent years
for veterans whose disabilities the Veterans Administration has not deemed permanent.”
of 2